Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5302SV (2) 91 sc/ns S.F. 2297 Section 1. Section 97B.17, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. The system may release the legal name 3 and city of last known address of a member or beneficiary to 4 the treasurer of state for purposes of assisting the system in 5 locating the member or beneficiary. 6 Sec. 2. Section 97B.18, Code 2026, is amended to read as 7 follows: 8 97B.18 Statement of accumulated credit. 9 After the expiration of each calendar year and prior to July 10 1 of the succeeding year , the system shall furnish each member 11 with a statement of the memberâs accumulated contributions and 12 benefit credits accrued under this chapter up to the end of 13 that calendar year over the prior four quarters and additional 14 information the system deems useful to a member. The system 15 may furnish an estimate of the credits as of the projected 16 normal retirement date of the member under section 97B.45 . The 17 records of the system as shown by the statement as to the wages 18 of each individual member for a year and the periods of payment 19 shall be conclusive for the purpose of this chapter , except as 20 otherwise provided in this chapter . 21 Sec. 3. Section 97B.48, subsection 6, Code 2026, is amended 22 to read as follows: 23 6. Effective July 1, 2005, monthly Monthly retirement 24 allowance payments shall be directly deposited without charge 25 to a retired memberâs account via electronic funds transfer. 26 A In lieu of electronic funds transfers, a retired member 27 may elect to receive monthly allowance payments in the form 28 of a reloadable payment card for which the system shall not 29 charge an administrative fee, or as paper warrants in lieu 30 of electronic funds transfers, but for which the system 31 shall charge an administrative fee for processing such paper 32 warrants . However, the system may, for good cause shown, waive 33 the administrative fee. The fee may be automatically deducted 34 from the monthly retirement allowance before the warrant is 35 -1- LSB 5302SV (2) 91 sc/ns 1/ 2 S.F. 2297 issued to the retired member. 1 Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 2 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 3